Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201371-1955
Quality rating and improvement system;
State Department of Education; Department of Health and Human Services; duties.

The State Department
of Education and the Department of Health and Human Services shall collaborate
(1) to develop, implement, and provide oversight for a quality rating and
improvement system for participating applicable child care and early childhood
education programs, (2) to establish quality rating criteria for the system
as provided in sections 71-1956 and 71-1958, (3) to use the quality rating
criteria to assign quality scale ratings to participating applicable child
care and early childhood education programs as provided in sections 71-1956
and 71-1958, and (4) to provide incentives and support, including professional
development, training, and postsecondary education opportunities, to participating
applicable child care and early childhood education programs as provided in
section 71-1961.

Laws 2013, LB507, § 4.